District of Columbia statutes.
22-3321

Obstructing public highway.

Any person who, without lawful authority, shall obstruct the free use of any of the public highways, which had been used and recognized as public county roads for 25 years prior to May 3, 1862, and which were thereafter duly surveyed, recorded, and declared public highways according to law, shall be subject to a fine for each offense of not less than $100 nor more than $250 and be imprisoned till the fine and the costs of suit and collection of the same are paid.

R.S., D.C., § 269
1973 Ed., § 22-3121.
1981 Ed., § 22-3121.
This section is referenced in § 22-3322.